Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
ARTICLE 20
TRANSPORTATION OF HAZARDOUS
AND NUCLEAR MATERIALS

Cross references:

For criminal provisions relating to hazardous waste violations, see § 18-13-112; for provisions relating to hazardous waste, see article 15 of title 25; for provisions relating to hazardous substance incidents, see article 22 of title 29.

Section

PART 1 HAZARDOUS MATERIALS -
GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 PERMIT SYSTEM FOR
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS

PART 3 ROUTE DESIGNATION FOR
HAZARDOUS MATERIALS

PART 4 NUCLEAR MATERIALS -
GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 5 NUCLEAR MATERIALS
PERMIT SYSTEM